Maryland, session 2026, HB0515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
5–901.
In this subtitle, “local team” means the multidisciplinary and multiagency drug
overdose fatality review team established for a county.
5–902.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0515*

HOUSE BILL 515
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, there may be a
multidisciplinary and multiagency drug overdose fatality review team in each county.
(2) Instead of a local team in each county, two or more counties may agree
to establish a single multicounty local team.
(3) A multicounty local team shall execute a memorandum of
understanding on membership, staffing, and operation.
(b) The local team membership shall be drawn, if available, from the following
individuals, organizations, agencies, and areas of expertise:
(1) The county health officer, or the officer’s designee;
(2) The director of the local department of social services, or the director’s
designee;
(3) The State’s Attorney, or the State’s Attorney’s designee;
(4) The superintendent of schools, or the superintendent’s designee;
(5) A State, county, or municipal law enforcement officer;
(6) The director of behavioral health services in the county, or the director’s
designee;
(7) An emergency medical services provider in the county;
(8) A representative of a hospital WHO SERVES AS A VICE PRESIDENT, A
CHIEF MEDICAL OFFICER, OR AN ASSISTANT MEDICAL OFFICER AT THE HOSPITAL;
(9) A health care professional who specializes in the prevention, diagnosis,
and treatment of substance use disorders;
(10) A representative of a local jail or detention center;
(11) A representative from parole, probation, and community corrections;
(12) The Secretary of Juvenile Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(13) A member of the public with interest or expertise in the prevention and
treatment of drug overdose deaths, appointed by the county health officer; and
(14) Any other individual necessary for the work of the local team,
recommended by the local team and appointed by the county health officer.
(c) Each local team shall elect a chair from among its members.

HOUSE BILL 515 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.